Wyoming, session 2025, HB0308.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-32-101 through 40-32-103 is
created to read:

CHAPTER 32
CRYPTOGRAPHIC FRONTIERS ACT

HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
40-32-101. Cryptographic Frontiers Act; short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Cryptographic Frontiers Act".

40-32-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless the context otherwise
requires:

(i) "0x Addresses" means a human readable
representation of bytes providing an address to locate
blockchain transactions, CID's, wallet addresses, tokens or
other blockchain related constructs;

(ii) "Ascription" means to cryptographically
sign a blockchain transaction (or similar analog), CID or
protocol with special attributes disambiguating 0x
Addresses of different blockchains and blockchain
transactions;

(iii) "Blockchain" means as defined in W.S.
34-29-106(g);
HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601

(iv) "Blockchain transaction" means a unit of
information in the form of a protocol inserted into a
blockchain block or similar analog;

(v) "By application" means initially by web
application then by ascription and seal pending
implementation constraints;

(vi) "Content identifier" or "CID" means a
cryptographic hash-based reference to digital content;

(vii) "Cryptocurrency" means a type of digital
asset that operates on its own native blockchain;

(viii) "Cryptographically sign" means the
signing of a message, record, CID, blockchain transaction
or similar analog or any other information using private
keys;

(ix) "Cryptographically signing a blockchain
transaction" means signing information in the form of a
protocol along with a timestamp inserted into a blockchain
HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
transaction through the processes of cryptographic signing
using a public key infrastructure or other cryptographic
proofs algorithm;

(x) "Private key" means as defined in W.S.
34-29-101(a)(v);

(xi) "Token" means a cryptographically signed
protocol of a mathematical curve having starting and ending
values or metrics defining relationships of one (1) or more
metrics.

40-32-103. Federal overreach; Attorney general
actions.

(a) The attorney general shall investigate claims by
Wyoming residents or businesses of constitutional
violations or overreach by the federal government in each
of the following areas:

(i) Unlawful financial service disruptions
including:

HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
(A) Debanking of Wyoming residents;

(B) Interference with special purpose
depository institution's bank and master account access;

(C) Restrictions on stable coin usage.

(ii) Unlawful restrictions on the exercise of
free expression made through:

(A) Cryptocurrency, token or blockchain
transactions;

(B) Testing and simulation activities
including the use of testnets;

(C) Cryptographic signing of blockchain
transactions;

(D) Smart contract deployment;

(E) CID creation and cryptographic signing;

HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
(F) On-chain governance;

(G) Tokenized voting systems;

(H) Decentralized governance mechanisms;

(J) Access to financial services when
exercising any of the protected expressions under this
paragraph.

(iii) Unreasonable searches or seizures of:

(A) Private keys;

(B) Digital assets;

(C) Cryptographically signed data;

(D) Blockchain transactions;

(E) Cryptographically signed or ascribed
data, including blockchain transactions, smart contracts,
HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
CID's or other similar analog representations of
information, data or records.

(iv) Unlawful federal actions compelling
disclosure or production of:

(A) Private keys;

(B) Seed phrases;

(C) Cryptographic secrets;

(D) Transaction histories;

(E) Wallet contents;

(F) Self-incriminating digital asset
information;

(G) Digital asset forfeitures;

(H) Cryptocurrency seizures;

HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
(J) Blockchain-based activity regulation.

(v) Unlawful federal overreach burdening:

(A) Intrastate cryptocurrency transactions;

(B) Digital identity implementations;

(C) Cryptographic signing activities;

(D) Smart contract deployments;

(E) Token governance systems;

(F) Cryptographically signed or ascribed
data, including blockchain transactions, smart contracts,
CID's or other similar analog representations of
information, data or records;

(G) Interference with state level
regulations of digital assets.

HB0308

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0601
(b) The attorney general may seek to initiate a
lawsuit, or intervene or file an amicus curiae brief in any
lawsuit filed in any state or federal court in Wyoming, or
filed against any Wyoming resident or business in any other
jurisdiction as a result of unlawful federal infringement
on the rights described in subsection (a) of this act if,
in his judgment, the federal action endangers the rights of
Wyoming residents or businesses. Before initiating or
intervening in any lawsuit pursuant to this section, the
attorney general shall obtain the approval of the governor.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0308